Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska51-205
Library board; bylaws, rules, and regulations.

The library board shall have the power to make and adopt such bylaws, rules, and regulations for its own guidance and for the government of the library and reading room as it may deem expedient, not inconsistent with sections 51-201 to 51-219.

Laws 1911, c. 73, § 4, p. 315;

R.S.1913, § 3795;

C.S.1922, § 3188;

Laws 1923, c. 148, § 1, p. 363;

Laws 1925, c. 38, § 1, p. 149;

C.S.1929, § 51-204;

Laws 1941, c. 103, § 1, p. 421;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 51-204;

R.S.1943, § 51-205;

Laws 1997, LB 250, § 19.